test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_I_mitigwaab_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymiwaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsminaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmiwaa
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4: mitgwaabiinymini
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: mitgwaabiinsmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: nmitgwaabiinymiba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinymidig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: nmitgwaabiinsmiba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsmidig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gmitgwaabiinymiba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymidig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gmitgwaabiinsmiba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmidig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: mitgwaabiinymiba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiinymidig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: mitgwaabiinsmiba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiinsmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: nmitgwaabiinyman
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: nmitgwaabiinyming
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: nmitgwaabiinymag
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: nmitgwaabiinsman
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsming
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsmag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gmitgwaabiinyman
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gmitgwaabiinyming
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gmitgwaabiinsman
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsming
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: mitgwaabiinyman
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: mitgwaabiinyming
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: mitgwaabiinsman
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: mitgwaabiinsming
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: mitgwaabiinyman
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: mitgwaabiinyming
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: mitgwaabiinymag
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: mitgwaabiinsman
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: mitgwaabiinsming
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: mitgwaabiinsmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiinyshinaa
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsshinaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyshinaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyshiwaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsshinaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsshiwaa
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+3+4: mitgwaabiinyshini
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4: mitgwaabiinsshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: nmitgwaabiinyshiba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinyshidig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: nmitgwaabiinsshiba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsshidig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gmitgwaabiinyshiba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyshidig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gmitgwaabiinsshiba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsshidig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: mitgwaabiinyshiba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiinyshidig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: mitgwaabiinsshiba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiinsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+4: nmitgwaabiinyshan
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: nmitgwaabiinyshing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: nmitgwaabiinyshag
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+4: nmitgwaabiinsshan
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsshing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsshag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+4: gmitgwaabiinyshan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gmitgwaabiinyshing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyshag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gmitgwaabiinsshan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsshing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsshag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+4: mitgwaabiinyshan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: mitgwaabiinyshing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+4: mitgwaabiinsshan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: mitgwaabiinsshing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+4: mitgwaabiinyshan
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: mitgwaabiinyshing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: mitgwaabiinyshag
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+4: mitgwaabiinsshan
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: mitgwaabiinsshing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: mitgwaabiinsshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: nmitgwaabiinynaanba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinynaandig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: nmitgwaabiinsnaanba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinynaanba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinynaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinywaaba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinywaadig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinsnaanba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinswaaba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinswaadig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+3+4+Prt: mitgwaabiinyniwba
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt: mitgwaabiinsniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: nmitgwaabiinynaanin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: nmitgwaabiinynaaning
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: nmitgwaabiinynaanig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: nmitgwaabiinsnaanin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsnaaning
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinynaanin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinynaaning
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinynaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinywaan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinywaang
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinywaag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinsnaanin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsnaaning
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinswaan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinswaang
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinswaag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: mitgwaabiinywaan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: mitgwaabiinywaang
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+3+4+4: mitgwaabiinyniwan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+3+4+Loc: mitgwaabiinyniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: mitgwaabiinswaan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: mitgwaabiinswaang
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+3+4+4: mitgwaabiinsniwan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+3+4+Loc: mitgwaabiinsniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinybaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinybaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinybaniig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinsbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinybaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinybaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinybaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsbaniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinybaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinybaniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsbaniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinybaniin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinybaniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: mitgwaabiinybaniig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsbaniin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsbaniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: mitgwaabiinsbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiimshinaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshinaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshiwaa
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: mitgwaabiimshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nmitgwaabiimshiba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiimshidig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gmitgwaabiimshiba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshidig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: mitgwaabiimshiba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiimshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: nmitgwaabiimshan
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nmitgwaabiimshing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nmitgwaabiimshag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gmitgwaabiimshan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gmitgwaabiimshing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: mitgwaabiimshan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: mitgwaabiimshing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: mitgwaabiimshan
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: mitgwaabiimshing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: mitgwaabiimshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nmitgwaabiimnaanba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiimnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiimnaanba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiimnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiimwaaba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiimwaadig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: mitgwaabiimniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nmitgwaabiimnaanin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nmitgwaabiimnaaning
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nmitgwaabiimnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiimnaanin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiimnaaning
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiimnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiimwaan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiimwaang
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiimwaag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: mitgwaabiimwaan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: mitgwaabiimwaang
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+3+4+4: mitgwaabiimniwan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: mitgwaabiimniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiimbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiimbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiimbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiimbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiimbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiimbaniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: mitgwaabiimbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiimbaniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: mitgwaabiimbaniin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiimbaniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: mitgwaabiimbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmitgwaabiishnaanba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiishnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiishnaanba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiishnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiishwaaba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiishwaadig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: mitgwaabiishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmitgwaabiishnaanin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmitgwaabiishnaaning
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmitgwaabiishnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiishnaanin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiishnaaning
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiishnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiishwaan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiishwaang
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiishwaag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: mitgwaabiishwaan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mitgwaabiishwaang
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+3+4+4: mitgwaabiishniwan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+3+4+Loc: mitgwaabiishniing
     
